incubator/apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
    <pardef n="kur__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gilia/i__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usiai</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grei/tai__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tai</l>
          <r>tai<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiau</l>
          <r>tai<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usiai</l>
          <r>tai<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="daug__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iau</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iausiai</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="ir__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="abipus__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="abipus"><i>abipus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anapus"><i>anapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anot"><i>anot</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ant"><i>ant</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arti"><i>arti</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="arčiau"><i>arčiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aukščiau"><i>aukščiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="be"><i>be</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėka"><i>dėka</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dėl"><i>dėl</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="greta"><i>greta</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iki"><i>iki</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iš"><i>iš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="išilgai"><i>išilgai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kitapus"><i>kitapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><i>lig</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ligi"><i>ligi</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="link"><i>link</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="netoli"><i>netoli</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nuo"><i>nuo</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pasak"><i>pasak</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirma"><i>pirma</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirmiau"><i>pirmiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prie"><i>prie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pusiau"><i>pusiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skersai"><i>skersai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šalia"><i>šalia</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šiapus"><i>šiapus</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tarp"><i>tarp</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viduj"><i>viduj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vidury"><i>vidury</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vietoj"><i>vietoj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virš"><i>virš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršuj"><i>viršuj</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viršum"><i>viršum</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="žemiau"><i>žemiau</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apie"><i>apie</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aplink"><i>aplink</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="į"><i>į</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įkypai"><i>įkypai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="įstrižai"><i>įstrižai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="išilgai"><i>išilgai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kiaurai"><i>kiaurai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pagal"><i>pagal</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="palei"><i>palei</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pas"><i>pas</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="paskui"><i>paskui</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prieš"><i>prieš</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="priešais"><i>priešais</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pro"><i>pro</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skradžiai"><i>skradžiai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="skersai"><i>skersai</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="už"><i>už</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="su"><i>su</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sulig"><i>sulig</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ties"><i>ties</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tol"><i>tol</i><par n="abipus__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ir"><i>ir</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bei"><i>bei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tačiau"><i>tačiau</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kad"><i>kad</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jog"><i>jog</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kai"><i>kai</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kol"><i>kol</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jei"><i>jei</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jeigu"><i>jeigu</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nes"><i>nes</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kadangi"><i>kadangi</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kaip"><i>kaip</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nors"><i>nors</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="arba"><i>arba</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>dar</i><par n="ir__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kur"><i>kur</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kodel"><i>kodel</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="daug"><i>daug</i><par n="daug__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ypač"><i>ypač</i><par n="daug__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="giliai"><i>gilia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="blogai"><i>bloga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dažnai"><i>dažna</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dieviškai"><i>dieviška</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gerai"><i>gera</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gražiai"><i>gražia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="išdaigiai"><i>išdaigia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="iškalbiai"><i>iškalbia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meniškai"><i>meniška</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="labai"><i>laba</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="laisvai"><i>laisva</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lengvai"><i>lengva</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mielai"><i>miela</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mįslingai"><i>mįslinga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neramiai"><i>neramia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="netvarkingai"><i>netvarkinga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paslaptingai"><i>paslaptinga</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="patraukliai"><i>patrauklia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="saugiai"><i>saugia</i><par n="gilia/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="greitai"><i>grei</i><par n="grei/tai__adv"/></e>
